Hawaii statutes.
[§226-63] Hawaii interagency council for
transit-oriented development. (a) There is established the Hawaii
interagency council for transit-oriented development, which shall be an
advisory body exempt from section 26-34, to coordinate and facilitate state
agency transit-oriented development planning, and facilitate consultation and
collaboration between the State and the counties on transit-oriented
development initiatives. The Hawaii interagency council for transit-oriented
development shall be established within the department of business, economic
development, and tourism for administrative purposes.

(b) The Hawaii interagency council for
transit-oriented development shall:

(1) Serve as the State's transit-oriented development
planning and policy development entity with representation from state and
county government and the community;

(2) Formulate and advise the governor on the
implementation of a strategic plan to address transit-oriented development
projects, including mixed use and affordable and rental housing projects, on
state lands in each county;

(3) Facilitate the acquisition of funding and
resources for state and county transit-oriented development programs, including
affordable and rental housing projects, on state lands;

(4) Monitor the preparation and conduct of plans and
studies to facilitate implementation of state transit-oriented development
plans prepared pursuant to this section, including but not limited to the
preparation of site or master plans and implementation plans and studies;

(5) Review all capital improvement project requests
to the legislature for transit-oriented development projects, including mixed
use and affordable and rental housing projects, on state lands within
county-designated transit-oriented development zones or within a one-half-mile
radius of public transit stations, if a county has not designated
transit-oriented development zones;

(6) Recommend policy, regulatory, and statutory
changes, and identify resource strategies for the successful execution of the
strategic plan;

(7) Assemble accurate fiscal and demographic
information to support policy development and track outcomes;

(8) Consider collaborative transit-oriented
development initiatives of other states that have demonstrated positive
outcomes; and

(9) Report annually to the governor, the legislature,
and the mayor of each county on the progress of its activities, including
formulation and progress on the strategic plan no later than twenty days prior
to the convening of each regular session.

(c) The strategic plan developed by the Hawaii
interagency council for transit-oriented development shall:

(1) Coordinate with the counties on transit-oriented
development;

(2) For each county, compile an inventory of state,
county, and private sector transit-oriented development projects lacking
infrastructure, identifying the type of infrastructure each project lacks, and
the approximate time frame when additional capacity is needed;

(3) Prioritize the development of transit-oriented
development projects, including mixed use and affordable and rental housing
projects, on state lands;

(4) Identify financing and prioritize state financing
for the public infrastructure, facility, and service investments required to
support transit-oriented development, mixed use, and affordable and rental
housing project plans; and

(5) Encourage and promote partnerships between public
and private entities to identify, renovate, and secure affordable housing
options on state lands within county-designated transit-oriented development
areas or within a one-half-mile radius of public transit stations, if a county
has not designated transit-oriented development zones. [L 2016, c 130, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next